Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.180

Obscuring the identity of a machine.

(1) A person is guilty of obscuring the identity of a machine if he or she knowingly:

(a) Obscures the manufacturer's serial number or any other distinguishing identification number or mark upon any vehicle, machine, engine, apparatus, appliance, or other device with intent to render it unidentifiable; or

(b) Possesses a vehicle, machine, engine, apparatus, appliance, or other device held for sale knowing that the serial number or other identification number or mark has been obscured.

(2) "Obscure" means to remove, deface, cover, alter, destroy, or otherwise render unidentifiable.

(3) Obscuring the identity of a machine is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 378; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.180.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.